Illinois, session 104th, HB5153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.25 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-58)8    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 9except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire 10rifle, muzzleloading pistol, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as 11provided by administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during 12the open season of not more than 14 days which will be set 13annually by the Director between the dates of November 1st and 14December 31st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only 15season between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 16purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 17limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 18or revolver and centerfire rifles that are single shot. The 19only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 20bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 21a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 22straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger, 23both of which must be available as a factory load with the   HB5153- 2 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a 2capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 3The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 4jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.5    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 6management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 7arrow season.8    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 9with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 10set annually by the Director between the dates of September 111st and January 31st, both inclusive.12    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 13with (i) a muzzleloading pistol or a muzzleloading rifle or 14(ii) bow and arrow during the open season for muzzleloading 15pistols and muzzleloading rifles set annually by the Director.16    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 17forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 18possession limits and those counties of the State where open 19seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 20Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.21    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 22the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 23found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 24or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 25announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 26shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.  HB5153- 3 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 2harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 3purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 4the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 5season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 6and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 7February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 8announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 9shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 10The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 11regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to 12management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 13program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 14that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 15to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 16held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 17issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 18the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 19program. 20    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 21the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 22providing information regarding deer management programs 23established by the Code or by administrative rule that 24includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 25separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 26communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what   HB5153- 4 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 2    Within one year after the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 4shall adopt rules regarding hunting deer with a muzzleloading 5pistol that allow for hunting deer with a muzzleloading pistol 6in the same seasons and under the same or similar restrictions 7as hunting deer with a muzzleloading rifle.8(Source: P.A. 101-66, eff. 7-12-19; 102-314, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-932, eff. 1-1-23.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-58)11    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 12except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire 13rifle, muzzleloading pistol, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as 14provided by administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during 15the open season of not more than 14 days which will be set 16annually by the Director between the dates of November 1st and 17December 31st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only 18season between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 19purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 20limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 21or revolver and centerfire rifles that are single shot. The 22only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 23bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 24a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 25straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger,   HB5153- 5 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1both of which must be available as a factory load with the 2published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a 3capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 4The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 5jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.6    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 7management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 8arrow season.9    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 10with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 11set annually by the Director between the dates of September 121st and January 31st, both inclusive.13    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 14with (i) a muzzleloading pistol or a muzzleloading rifle or 15(ii) bow and arrow during the open season for muzzleloading 16pistols and muzzleloading rifles set annually by the Director.17    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 18forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 19possession limits and those counties of the State where open 20seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 21Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.22    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 23the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 24found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 25or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 26announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and   HB5153- 6 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.2    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 3harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 4purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 5the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 6season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 7and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 8February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 9announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 10shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 11The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 12regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to 13management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 14program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 15that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 16to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 17held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 18issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 19the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 20program. 21    If the Department is using its sharpshooting program to 22manage chronic wasting disease in a deer herd that is found in 23a county in the State and if no cases of that disease have been 24identified in that herd in the preceding 3 calendar years, 25then the Department shall end the use of that program to manage 26chronic wasting disease in that county. However, the program   HB5153- 7 -LRB104 16097 BDA 29397 b1may be reinstituted within the county if chronic wasting 2disease is again identified in that herd. 3    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 4the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 5providing information regarding deer management programs 6established by the Code or by administrative rule that 7includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 8separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 9communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 10happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 11    Within one year after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 13shall adopt rules regarding hunting deer with a muzzleloading 14pistol that allow for hunting deer with a muzzleloading pistol 15in the same seasons and under the same or similar restrictions 16as hunting deer with a muzzleloading rifle. 17(Source: P.A. 104-58, eff. 1-1-26.) 18    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 19changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 20that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 21represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 22not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 23made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 24Public Act.